Utah statutes.
47-3-302.   Use and availability.

(1)  Use of a shooting range by a group may not interfere with the use of the range by the state agency, military, institution of higher education, or political subdivision for whom the range was constructed.

(2)  Outdoor shooting ranges shall be available on weekends and holidays, provided they are not being used for shooting and training purposes by the owner or operator of the range.

(3)  Each group that uses a shooting range owned or operated by a state agency, institution of higher education, or political subdivision shall provide a certified official to oversee their shooting activities while on the range.  If the group does not have a certified official that is currently available, the owner or operator of the shooting range may provide one and charge a fee for that certified official's time.

(4)  A group using a public shooting range may not have anyone with the group who is prohibited from possessing a firearm.

(5)  Each group shall provide documentation of current and applicable liability insurance or waivers of liability to cover each state agency, institution of higher education, or a political subdivision, for each person shooting on or controlling the shooting range.

(6)  Shooting range operations shall be in accordance with safety standards adopted by the National Rifle Association or equivalent national shooting organization.

(7)  Staff from the owner or operator of the shooting range is not required to be present unless there is no certified official present with the group.

(8)  The certified official in charge at the applicable time shall be responsible for opening and securely closing the shooting range.



Enacted by Chapter 155, 2013 General Session

